Wyoming statutes. Title 41 Water
Division 2. Establishment

§ 41-3-720.
Power of district court.

The district court sitting in and for any county in this state, or any judge thereof in vacation is hereby vested with jurisdiction, power and authority when the conditions stated in W.S.

41-3-721

are found to exist, to establish water conservancy districts which may be entirely within or partly within and partly without the judicial district in which said court is located, for conserving, developing and stabilizing supplies of water for domestic, transportation, industrial, manufacturing, irrigation, power, recreation, and other beneficial uses as herein provided.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 101, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 41-82.

§ 41-3-721.
Petition for creation; conditions affecting inclusion of city or city and county.

Before any water conservancy district shall be established under this act [§§

41-3-701

through

41-3-779

], a petition shall be filed in the office of the clerk of the court vested with jurisdiction, in a county in which all or part of the lands embraced in such proposed water conservancy district are situated, signed by not fewer than twenty-five percent (25%) of the owners or entrymen on having not less than twenty-five percent (25%) of the irrigated lands or lands susceptible of irrigation under the works proposed for construction, to be included in the district, but not embraced within the incorporated limits of a city or town; and each tract (or tracts), of land shall be listed opposite the name of the signer, each such tract (or tracts), together with the improvements thereon, to have an assessed valuation of not less than one hundred dollars ($100.00); and be also signed by not fewer than five percent (5%) of the owners owning not less than five percent (5%) of nonirrigated land and/or lands embraced in the incorporated limits of a city or town, all situated in the proposed district; and each tract (or tracts) of land shall be listed opposite the name of the signer, each such tract (or tracts), together with improvements thereon, to have an assessed valuation of not less than one hundred dollars ($100.00).

In the event a petitioner shall sign such petition both as owner of irrigated or irrigable and nonirrigated land or lands situated within a municipality, his name shall be counted only as an owner of irrigated or irrigable lands. A signing petitioner shall not be permitted, after filing a petition, to withdraw his name therefrom.

No city, or city and county, of the first class as now, or hereafter defined, by the laws of the state of Wyoming, shall be included within such district unless by and with the written consent of the chief executive officer of such city, or city and county, with the approval of the legislative body of such municipality, and such consent may specify that the rate of taxation on the assessed valuation of property within said city, or city and county, under W.S.

41-3-771

shall not exceed a maximum rate which may be less than the rates set out in W.S.

41-3-771

, and in such case the district shall not have power to levy assessment on the property in said city, or city and county, at a greater rate than that specified in said consent.

The petition shall set forth:

The proposed name of said district;

That property within the proposed district will be benefited by the accomplishment of the purposes enumerated in W.S.

41-3-720

;

A general description of the purpose of the contemplated improvement, and of the territory to be included in the proposed district. Said description need not be given by metes and bounds or by legal subdivision, but it shall be sufficient to enable a property owner to ascertain whether his property is within the territory proposed to be organized as a district. Said territory need not be contiguous, provided it is so situated that the organization of a single district of the territory described is calculated to promote one (1) or more of the purposes enumerated in W.S.

41-3-720

;

The assessed value of all irrigated land within the boundaries of the proposed district;

A general designation of divisions of the district and the number of directors of the district proposed for each subdivision;

Said petition shall pray for the organization of the district by the name proposed.

No petition with the requisite signatures shall be declared null and void on account of alleged defects, but the court may at any time permit the petition to be amended to conform to the facts by correcting any errors in the description of the territory, or in any other particular. However, similar petitions or duplicate copies of the same petition for the organization of the same district may be filed and shall together be regarded as one (1) petition. All such petitions filed prior to the hearing on the first petition filed, shall be considered by the court the same as though filed with the first petition placed on file.

In determining whether the requisite number of landowners have signed the petition, the court shall be governed by the names as they appear upon the assessment records which shall be prima facie evidence of such ownership.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 101, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 41-83.

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Improvement of Existing Water Rights Through Unification — A Case Study on the Consolidation of Appropriations,” see II Land & Water L. Rev. 327 (1967).

§ 41-3-722.
Bond for expenses of proceedings.

At the time of filing the petition or at any time subsequent thereto, and prior to the time of hearing on said petition a bond shall be filed, with security approved by the court, sufficient to pay all expenses connected with the proceedings in case the organization of the district be not effected. If at any time during the proceeding the court shall be satisfied that the bond first executed is insufficient in amount, it may require the execution of an additional bond within a time to be fixed to be not less than ten (10) days distant and upon failure of the petitioners to execute the same, the petition shall be dismissed.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 101, § 5; W.S. 1957, § 41-84.

§ 41-3-723.
Hearing procedure generally.

Immediately after the filing of such petition, the court wherein such petition is filed or a judge thereof in vacation, shall by order fix a place and time, not less than sixty (60) days nor more than ninety (90) days after the petition is filed, for hearing thereon and thereupon the clerk of said court shall cause notice by publication to be made of the pendency of the petition and of the time and place of hearing thereon; the clerk of said court shall also forthwith cause a copy of said notice to be mailed by U.S. registered mail to the board of county commissioners of each of the several counties having territory within the proposed district. At the same time, and in the same manner, the clerk of said court aforesaid shall forward to the state engineer, at his office in the capital, a copy of the notice of hearing, and a certified copy of such petition.

The district court in and for the county in which the petition for the organization of a water conservancy district has been filed, shall thereafter for all purposes of this act [§§

41-3-701

through

41-3-779

], except as hereinafter otherwise provided, maintain and have original and exclusive jurisdiction, coextensive with the boundaries of said water conservancy district, and of land and other property proposed to be included in said district or affected by said district without regard to the usual limits of its jurisdiction.

The state engineer, in his official capacity, upon the filing of the petition for the organization of a water conservancy district, shall become an interested party in all court proceedings thereafter involving the validity, or invalidity, of such petition, and he shall have the right to participate as a party in all such proceedings either in person, by counsel, or both. Not later than ten (10) days prior to the date fixed by the court for the hearing on the pending petition, the state engineer shall file a formal answer in the proceedings, with copies of his answer to the attorneys representing the sponsors of the petition, in which said answer the state engineer shall indicate his approval, or disapproval, of said petition, or any part or parts thereof. If the state engineer disapproves the petition or any part or parts thereof, he shall set forth in detail in his answer his reasons for the disapproval. No replication, or other pleading, by the sponsors of the petition, to the answer of the state engineer, shall be permitted; but such sponsors at the hearing on the petition will be permitted to offer whatever material testimony or evidence they desire to present to the court with respect to the answer of the state engineer. The district judge who has jurisdiction over the proceedings may, in his discretion, request, or subpoena, the state engineer to appear as a witness in support of the answer filed by the state engineer.

No judge of such court wherein such petition is filed shall be disqualified to perform any duty imposed by this act by reason of ownership of property within any water conservancy district or proposed water conservancy district, or by reason of ownership of any property that may be benefited, taxed or assessed therein.

History:

Laws 1957, ch. 101, § 6; W.S. 1957, § 41-85; 2014 ch. 40, Laws 2014, ch. 40, § 2, effective March 6, 2014; 2014 ch. 40, § 2, effective March 6, 2014.

The 2014 amendment,

in (a), substituted “capital” for “capitol building, in Cheyenne, Wyoming” in the second sentence.

Laws 2014, ch. 40, § 10, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 6, 2014.

§ 41-3-724.
Protesting creation.

At any time after the filing of a petition for the organization of a conservancy district, and not less than thirty (30) days prior to the time fixed by the order of court for the hearing upon said petition, and not thereafter, a petition may be filed in the office of the clerk of the court wherein the proceeding for the creation of said district is pending, signed by not fewer than twenty percent (20%) of the owners of or entrymen on the irrigated lands, or lands susceptible of irrigation under the works proposed for construction, to be included in said proposed district, but not embraced within the incorporated limits of a city or town, who have not signed the petition for creating such district, and each tract (or tracts), of land shall be listed opposite the name of the signer, each such tract (or tracts), together with the improvements thereon, to have an assessed valuation of not less than one hundred dollars ($100.00) and also signed by not fewer than five percent (5%) of owners of nonirrigated lands and/or lands embraced in the incorporated limits of a city or town, all situated in the proposed district who have not signed the petition for creating such district, and each tract (or tracts) of land shall be listed opposite the name of the signer, each such tract (or tracts), together with improvements thereon, to have an assessed valuation of not less than one hundred dollars ($100.00), protesting the creating of said district. The signers of said protesting petition shall state therein the land owned by each, and shall also state the value thereof as shown by the last preceding assessment.

In the event a petitioner shall sign such petition both as owner of irrigated or irrigable and nonirrigated land or lands situated within a municipality his name shall be counted only as an owner of irrigated or irrigable lands.

Upon the filing of such protesting petition, it shall be the duty of the clerk of the court forthwith to make as many certified copies thereof, including the signatures thereto, as there are counties in which any part of said proposed district extends, and forthwith to place in the hands of the county assessor of each of such counties one (1) of said certified copies; and likewise, one (1) of said certified copies shall be forwarded promptly to the state engineer at his office in Cheyenne, Wyoming. Thereupon it shall be the duty of each of such county assessors to determine from the assessment records of his county in his hands, and to certify to the said district court under his official seal, prior to the day fixed for the hearing as aforesaid, the total assessed valuation of the several tracts of land listed in the protest, situated in said proposed district within his county. Upon the day set for the hearing upon the original petition, if it shall appear to the court from such certificate, or certificates, and from such other evidence as may be adduced by any party in interest, that said protesting petition is not signed by the requisite number of owners of lands and of the requisite value as herein set forth, the court shall thereupon dismiss said protesting petition and shall proceed with the original hearing as in this section provided.

If the court shall find from the evidence that said protesting petition is signed by the requisite number of owners of lands, and of the requisite values, the court shall forthwith dismiss the original petition praying for the creation of the district. The finding of the court upon the question of such total valuation, the genuineness of the signatures, and all matters of law and fact incident to such determination shall be final and conclusive on all parties in interest whether appearing or not.

Any owner, whether individual or corporate, of real property in said proposed district not having individually signed a petition for the organization of a conservancy district, and desiring to object to the organization and incorporation of said district, may, on or before the date set for the cause to be heard, file objection to the organization and incorporation of the district.

Such objection shall be limited to a denial of the statements in the petition and shall be heard by the court as an advanced case without unnecessary delay.

Upon the said hearing, if it shall appear that a petition for the organization of a water conservancy district has been signed and presented, as hereinabove provided, in conformity with this act [§§

41-3-701

through

41-3-779

] and that the allegations of the petition are true, and that no protesting petition has been filed, or if filed has been dismissed as hereinabove provided, and the state engineer has not objected to the petition or any part thereof, or his objections have not been sustained, the court shall, by order duly entered of record, adjudicate all questions of jurisdiction, declare the district organized and give it a corporate name, by which in all proceedings it shall thereafter be known, and thereupon the district shall be a political subdivision of the state of Wyoming and a body corporate with all the powers of a public or municipal corporation.

In such decree the court shall designate the place where the office or principal place of business of the district shall be located, which shall be within the corporate limits of the district, and which may be changed by order of court from time to time. The regular meetings of the board shall be held at such office or place of business, but for cause may be adjourned to any convenient place. The official records and files of the district shall be kept at the office so established.

If the court finds that no petition has been signed and presented in conformity with this act, or that the material facts are not as set forth in the petition filed, it shall dismiss said proceedings and adjudge the costs against the signers of the petition in such proportion as it shall deem just and equitable. No appeal or writ of error shall lie from an order dismissing the said proceeding; but nothing herein shall be construed to prevent the filing of a subsequent petition or petitions for similar improvements or for a similar water conservancy district, and the right so to renew such proceeding is hereby expressly granted and authorized.

If an order be entered establishing the district, such order shall be deemed final and no appeal or writ of error shall lie therefrom, and the entry of such order shall finally and conclusively establish the regular organization of said district against all persons except the state of Wyoming, in an action in the nature of a writ of quo warranto, commenced by the attorney general within three (3) months after said decree declaring such district organized as herein provided, and not otherwise. The organization of said district shall not be directly nor collaterally questioned in any suit, action or proceeding except as herein expressly authorized.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 101, § 7; W.S. 1957, § 41-86.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 41-3-725.
Filing of decree and copies of findings.

Within thirty (30) days after the said district has been declared a corporation by the court, the clerk of the court shall transmit to the secretary of state, to the state engineer, and to the county clerk and recorder in each of the counties having lands in said district, copies of the findings and the decree of the court incorporating said district. The same shall be filed in the office of the secretary of state in the same manner as articles of incorporation are now required to be filed under the general laws concerning corporations, and copies shall also be filed in the office of the county clerk and recorder of each county in which a part of the district may be, where they shall become permanent records; and the clerk and recorder in each county, and the secretary of state, shall receive for filing said copies such fees as now are or hereafter may be provided by law for like services in similar cases.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 101, § 8; W.S. 1957, § 41-87.

Cross references. —

As to fees collected by secretary of state, see §

9-1-305

.

As to filing of articles of incorporation, see §

17-8-103

.

§ 41-3-726.
Procedure for organizing subdistricts.

Subdistricts may be organized upon the petition of the owner of real property, within or partly within and partly without the district, which petition shall fulfill the same requirements concerning the subdistricts as the petition outlined in W.S.

41-3-721

is required to fulfill, concerning the organization of the main district and shall be filed with the clerk of the court, and shall be accompanied by a bond as provided for in W.S.

41-3-722

. All proceedings relating to the organization of such subdistricts shall conform in all things to the provision of this act [§§

41-3-701

through

41-3-779

] relating to the organization of districts; provided, that not more than a majority of the owners of lands, having one-half or more of the aggregate assessed value of the lands in the proposed subdistrict, shall be required to sign the petition for the creation of a subdistrict, and not more than twenty-five percent (25%) of the owners of lands in the proposed subdistrict shall be required to sign the protesting petition against the creation of such subdistrict. Whenever the court shall by its order duly entered of record, declare the [or] decree such subdistricts to be organized, the clerk of said court shall thereupon give notice of such order to the directors of the district who shall thereupon act also as directors of the subdistrict. Thereafter, the proceedings in reference to the subdistrict shall in all matters conform to the provision of this act except that in the appraisal of benefits for the purpose of such subdistricts, in the issuance of bonds, in levying of assessments and in all other matters affecting only the subdistrict, the provisions of this act shall apply to the subdistrict as though it were an independent district, and it shall not in these things be amalgamated with the main district. The said petition for organization of a subdistrict shall also contain a statement of the amount or quantity of water for which said subdistrict desires to acquire the perpetual use and the amount of money that said subdistrict is willing to pay therefor, and the court shall, prior to the entry of its decree organizing any territory into a subdistrict obtain the verified consent of the board to furnish such perpetual use of water for the purposes therein specified to such subdistrict at a price and upon the terms mentioned in the petition, then the court shall be authorized to enter its decree of organization of such subdistrict.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 101, § 15; W.S. 1957, § 41-88.